Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF964.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297B.02, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. In lieu tax for older passenger automobilenew text begin or motorcyclenew text end . In lieu of the tax imposed in subdivision 1, there is imposed a tax of $10 on the purchase price of any passenger automobile new text begin or motorcycle new text end described in section 297B.025, subdivision 1. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297B.02, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. In lieu tax for collector vehicle. In lieu of the tax imposed in subdivision 1, there is imposed a tax of $150 on the purchase price of a passenger automobilenew text begin , motorcycle,new text end or a fire truck described in section 297B.025, subdivision 2. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297B.025, is amended to read: 297B.025 OLDER PASSENGER AUTOMOBILEnew text begin ; MOTORCYCLEnew text end . Subdivision 1. Noncollector vehicle. Purchase or use of a passenger automobile as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 24, new text begin or a motorcycle as defined in section 168.002, subdivision 19, new text end shall be taxed pursuant to section 297B.02, subdivision 2, if the passenger automobile new text begin or motorcycle new text end (1) is in the tenth or subsequent year of vehicle life, and (2) does not have a resale value of $3,000 or more, as determined using nationally recognized sources of information on automobile resale values, as designated by the registrar of motor vehicles. Subd. 2. Collector vehicle. A passenger automobile that is registered under section 168.10, subdivision 1a, 1b, 1c, 1d, or 1h, new text begin a motorcycle registered under section 168.105, new text end or a fire truck registered under section 168.10, subdivision 1c, shall be taxed under section 297B.02, subdivision 3. If the vehicle is subsequently registered in another class not under section 168.10, subdivision 1a, 1b, 1c, 1d, or 1h, within one year of the date of registration under those subdivisions, it shall be subject to the full excise tax imposed under subdivision 1. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end